Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.730

Waiver of nonresident tuition fees differential—Washington/Oregon reciprocity program.

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the state board for community and technical colleges and the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, the community colleges, and The Evergreen State College may waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential for residents of Oregon, upon completion of and to the extent permitted by an agreement between the governing boards of the respective individual institutions of higher education or the state board for community and technical colleges and appropriate officials and agencies in Oregon granting similar waivers for residents of the state of Washington.

[ 2012 c 229 s 704; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 27; 1992 c 231 s 25; 1985 c 370 s 69; 1983 c 104 s 1; 1979 c 80 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Severability—1979 c 80: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 c 80 s 5.]